Missouri, session 2026, SB1721.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 116.030, 116.040, 116.050, 116.080,
2
116.090, 116.110, 116.130, 116.153, 116.200, and 116.332, RSMo,
3
and section 116.190 as enacted by senate bill no. 22, one
4
hundred third general assembly, first regular session, section
5
116.190 as enacted by senate bill no. 104, ninety-eighth general
6
assembly, first regular session, section 116.334 as enacted by
7
senate bill no. 22, one hundred third general assembly, first
8
regular session, and section 116.334 as enacted by house bill
9
no. 117, ninety-seventh general assembly, first regular
10
session, are repealed and twelve new sections enacted in lieu
11
thereof, to be known as sections 116.030, 116.040, 116.045,
12
116.050, 116.080, 116.090, 116.110, 116.130, 116.190, 116.200,
13
116.332, and 116.334, to read as follows:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1721 2
1
116.030. The following shall be substantially the form
2
of each page o f referendum petitions on any law passed by
3
the general assembly of the state of Missouri:
4
County ______
5
Page No. ______
6
It is a class A misdemeanor punishable,
7
notwithstanding the provisions of section [560.021]
8
558.002, RSMo, to the contrary, for a term of
9
imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county
10
jail or a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars
11
or both, for anyone to sign any referendum petition
12
with any name other than his or her own, or
13
knowingly to sign his or her name more than once
14
for the same measure for the same election, or to
15
sign a petition when such person knows he or she is
16
not a registered voter.
17
PETITION FOR REFERENDUM
18
To the Honorable ______, Secretary of State for the
19
state of Missouri:
20
We, the undersigned, registered voters of the state
21
of Missouri and ______ County (or City of St.
22
Louis), respectfully order that the Senate (or
23
House) Bill No. ______ entitled (title of law),
24
passed by the ______ general assembly of the state
25
of Missouri, at the ______ regular (or special)
26
session of the ______ general assembly, shall be
27
referred to the voters of the state of Missouri,
28
for their approval or rejection, at the general
29
election to be held on the ______ day of ______,
30
______, unless the general assembly shall designate
31
another date, and each for himself or herself says:
32
I have personally signed this petition; I am a
33
registered voter of the state of Missouri and
34
______ County (or City of St. Louis); my registered
35
voting address and the name of the city, town or

SB 1721 3
36
village in which I live are correctly written after
37
my name.
38
(Official Ballot title) ______
39
CIRCULATOR'S AFFIDAVIT
40
State Of Missouri,
41
County Of ______
42
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say (print or
43
type names of signers)
44
NAME DATE REGISTERED ZIP CONGR. NAME
45
SIGNED VOTING CODE DIST.
46
ADDRESS
47
(Signature) (Street) (Printed
48
(City, Town or
49
or Village) Typed)
50
(Here follow numbered lines for signers)
51
signed this page of the foregoing petition, and
52
each of them signed his or her name thereto in my
53
presence; I believe that each has stated his or her
54
name, registered voting address and city, town or
55
village correctly, and that each signer is a
56
registered voter of the state of Missouri and
57
______ County. FURTHERMORE, I HEREBY SWEAR OR
58
AFFIRM UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT ALL STATEMENTS
59
MADE BY ME ARE TRUE AND CORRECT AND THAT I HAVE
60
NEVER BEEN CONVICTED OF, FOUND GUILTY OF, OR PLED
61
GUILTY TO ANY OFFENSE INVOLVING FORGERY.
62
I have met the qualifications of section 116.080
63
and am at least 18 years of age. I do ______ do not
64
______ (check one) expect to be paid for
65
circulating this petition. If paid, list the payer
66
______

SB 1721 4
67
__________________
68
Signature of Affiant
69
(Person obtaining
70
signatures)
71
__________________
72
(Printed Name of Affiant)
73
__________________
74
Address of Affiant
75
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day
76
of ______, A.D. ______
77
__________________
78
Signature of Notary
79
Address of Notary
80
Notary Public (Seal)
81
My commission expires ______
82
If this form is followed substantially and the requirements
83
of [section] sections 116.045, 116.050, and [section]
84
116.080 are met, it shall be sufficient, disregarding
85
clerical and merely technical errors.
1
116.040. The following shall be substantially the form
2
of each page o f each petition for any law or amendment to
3
the Constitution of the state of Missouri proposed by the
4
initiative:
5
County ______

SB 1721 5
6
(Optional) Page No. ______
7
It is a class A misdemeanor punishable,
8
notwithstanding the provisions of section [560.021]
9
558.002, RSMo, to the contrary, for a term of
10
imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county
11
jail or a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars
12
or both, for anyone to sign any initiative petition
13
with any name other than his or her own, or
14
knowingly to sign his or her name more than once
15
for the same measure for the same election, or to
16
sign a petition when such person knows he or she is
17
not a registered voter.
18
INITIATIVE PETITION
19
To the Honorable ______, Secretary of State for the
20
state of Missouri:
21
We, the undersigned, registered voters of the state
22
of Missouri and ______ County (or City of St.
23
Louis), respectfully order that the following
24
proposed law (or amendment to the constitution)
25
shall be submitted to the voters of the state of
26
Missouri, for their approval or rejection, at the
27
general election to be held on the ______ day of
28
______, ______, and each for himself or herself
29
says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
30
a registered voter of the state of Missouri and
31
______ County (or City of St. Louis); my registered
32
voting address and the name of the city, town or
33
village in which I live are correctly written after
34
my name.
35
(Official Ballot title) ______
36
CIRCULATOR'S AFFIDAVIT
37
State Of Missouri,
38
County Of ______

SB 1721 6
39
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say (print or
40
type names of signers)
41
NAME DATE REGISTERED ZIP CONGR. NAME
42
SIGNED VOTING CODE DIST.
43
ADDRESS
44
(Signature) (Street) (Printed
45
(City, or
46
Town or Typed)
47
Village)
48
(Here follow numbered lines for signers)
49
signed this page of the foregoing petition, and
50
each of them signed his or her name thereto in my
51
presence; I believe that each has stated his or her
52
name, registered voting address and city, town or
53
village correctly, and that each signer is a
54
registered voter of the state of Missouri and
55
______ County.
56
FURTHERMORE, I HEREBY SWEAR OR AFFIRM UNDER PENALTY
57
OF PERJURY THAT ALL STATEMENTS MADE BY ME ARE TRUE
58
AND CORRECT AND THAT I HAVE NEVER BEEN CONVICTED
59
OF, FOUND GUILTY OF, OR PLED GUILTY TO ANY OFFENSE
60
INVOLVING FORGERY.
61
I have met the qualifications of section 116.080
62
and am at least 18 years of age. I do ______ do not
63
______ (check one) expect to be paid for
64
circulating this petition. If paid, list the payer
65
______
66
__________________
67
Signature of Affiant
68
(Person obtaining
69
signatures)

SB 1721 7
70
__________________
71
(Printed Name of Affiant)
72
__________________
73
Address of Affiant
74
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day
75
of ______, A.D. ______
76
__________________
77
Signature of Notary
78
Address of Notary
79
Notary Public (Seal)
80
My commission expires ______
81
If this form is followed substantially and the requirements
82
of [section] sections 116.045, 116.050, and [section]
83
116.080 are met, it shall be sufficient, disregarding
84
clerical and merely technical errors.
1
116.045. Initiative petition and referendum petition
2
signature pag e s shall be printed on a form as prescribed by
3
the secretary of state that shall include all of the
4
information and statements required by section 116.030 or
5
116.040, as applicable, and comply with section 116.050.
6
The form shall be made available in electronic format to be
7
used for printing petitions for circulating.
1
116.050. 1. Initiative and referendum petitions filed
2
under the pro v isi o ns of this chapter shall consist of pages
3
of a uniform size. Each page, excluding the text of the
4
measure, shall be n o larger than eight and one-half by

SB 1721 8
5
fourteen inches. The text of the proposed measure shall be
6
in a font that i s not smaller than twelve-point Times New
7
Roman and have a top, bottom, left, and right margin of not
8
less than one inch. Page numbers may appear in the bottom
9
margin. Each page o f an initiative petition shall be
10
attache d to or shall contain a full and correct text of the
11
proposed measure. Each page of a referendum petition shall
12
be attached to or shall contain a full and correct text of
13
the measure on which the referendum is sought.
14
2. The full and correct text of all initiative and
15
referen d um petition measures shall:
16
(1) Contain all matter which is to be deleted included
17
in its p r oper place enclosed in brackets and all new matter
18
shown underlined;
19
(2) Include all sections of existing law or of the
20
constitu t ion which would be repealed by the measure; and
21
(3) Otherwise conform to the provisions of [Article
22
III, Sec t ion 28 and] Article III, [Section] Sections 28, 49,
23
50, 51, and 52(a) of the Constitution of Missouri and those
24
of this chapter.
1
116.080. 1. Each petition circulator shall be [at
2
least] a citi z en o f the United States, eighteen years of age
3
or older, a resident of this state or physically present in
4
this state for at least thirty consecutive days prior to the
5
collection of signatures, and registered with the secretary
6
of state. No petition circulator shall be paid anything of
7
value tha t is based on the number of signatures collected.
8
Signatures collected by any circulator who has not
9
registered with the secretary of state pursuant to this
10
chapter on or before 5:00 p.m. on the final day for filing
11
petitions with the secretary of state shall not be counted.
12
A petition circulator shall be deemed registered at the time

SB 1721 9
13
such circulator delivers a signed circulator's affidavit
14
pursuant to section 116.030, with respect to a referendum
15
petition, or section 116.040, with respect to an initiative
16
petition, to the office of the secretary of state. No
17
person shall qualify as a petition circulator who h as been
18
convicted of, found guilty of, or pled guilty to an offense
19
involving forgery under the laws of this state or an offense
20
under the laws of any other jurisdiction if that offense
21
would be considered forgery under the laws of this state.
22
2. Each petition circulator shall subscribe and swear
23
to the p roper affidavit on each petition page such
24
circulator submits before a notary public commissioned in
25
Missouri. When notarizing a circulator's signature, a
26
notary pu b lic shall sign his or her official signature and
27
affix his or her official seal to the affidavit only if the
28
circulator personally appears before the notary and
29
subscribes and swears to the affidavit in his or her
30
presence.
31
3. Any circulator who falsely swears to a circulator's
32
affidav i t knowing it to be false is guilty of a class A
33
misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions of
34
section [560.021] 558.002 to the contrary, for a term of
35
imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county jail or a
36
fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars or both.
1
116.090. 1. Any person who commits any of the
2
following act i ons is guilty of the crime of petition
3
signature fraud:
4
(1) Signs any name other than his or her own to any
5
petition , or who knowingly signs his or her name more than
6
once for the same measure for the same election, or who
7
knows he or she is not at the time of signing or circulating

SB 1721 10
8
the same a Missouri registered voter and a resident of this
9
state; [or]
10
(2) Intentionally submits petition signature sheets
11
with the knowledge that the person whose name appears on the
12
signature sheet did not actually sign the petition; [or]
13
(3) Causes a voter to sign a petition other than the
14
one the v oter intended to sign; [or]
15
(4) Forges or falsifies signatures; or
16
(5) Knowingly accepts or offers money or anything of
17
value to another person in exchange for a signature on a
18
petition.
19
2. Any person who knowingly causes a petition
20
circula t or's signatures to be submitted for counting, and
21
who either knows that such circulator has violated
22
subsection 1 of this section or, after receiving notice of
23
facts indicating that such person may have violated
24
subsection 1 of this section, causes the signatures to be
25
submitted with reckless indifference as to whether such
26
circulator has complied with subsection 1 of this section,
27
shall also be deemed to have committed the crime of petition
28
signature fraud.
29
3. A person who violates subsection 1 or 2 of this
30
section , shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a
31
class A misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the
32
provisions of section [560.021] 558.002 to the contrary, by
33
a term of imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county
34
jail or a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars or both.
35
4. Any person employed by or serving as an election
36
authori t y, that has reasonable cause to suspect a person has
37
committed petition signature fraud, shall immediately report
38
or cause a report to be made to the appropriate prosecuting

SB 1721 11
39
authorities. Failure to so report or cause a report to be
40
made shall be a class A misdemeanor.
1
116.110. Any voter who has signed an initiative or
2
referendum pe t ition may withdraw his or her signature from
3
that petition by submitting to the secretary of state,
4
before the petition is filed with the secretary of state, a
5
sworn statement requesting that his or her signature be
6
withdrawn and affirming the name of the petition signed, the
7
name the voter used when signing the petition, the address
8
of the voter and the county of residence. It is a class A
9
misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding t h e provisions of
10
section [560.021] 558.002 to the contrary, for a term of
11
imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county jail or a
12
fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars or both, to
13
knowingly file a false withdrawal statement with the
14
secretary of state.
1
116.130. 1. The secretary of state may send copies of
2
petition page s to election authorities to verify that the
3
persons whose names are listed as signers to the petition
4
are registered voters. Such verification may either be of
5
each signature or by r a ndom sampling as provided in section
6
116.120, as the secretary shall direct. If copies of the
7
petition pages are sent to an election a uthority for
8
verification, such copies shall be sent pursuant to the
9
following schedule:
10
(1) Copies of all pages from not less than one
11
petition shall be received in the office of the election
12
authority not later than two weeks after the petition is
13
filed in the office of the secretary of state;
14
(2) Copies of all pages of a total of three petitions
15
shall be received in the office of the election authority

SB 1721 12
16
not later than three weeks after the petition is filed in
17
the office of the secretary of state;
18
(3) If more than three petitions are filed, all copies
19
of petit i on pages, including those petitions selected for
20
verification by random sample pursuant to section 116.120,
21
shall be received in the office of the election authority
22
not later than the fourth week after the petition is filed
23
in the office of the secretary of state.
24
Each election authority shall check the signatures against
25
voter registration records in the election authority's
26
jurisdiction, but the election authority shall count as
27
valid only the signatures of persons registered as voters in
28
the county named in the circulator's affidavit. Signatures
29
shall not be counted as valid if they have been struck
30
through or crossed out. Signatures shall be recorded using
31
a black or dark ink.
32
2. If the election authority is requested to verify
33
the pet i tion by random sampling, such verification shall be
34
completed and certified not later than thirty days from the
35
date that the election authority receives the petition from
36
the secretary of state. If the election authority is to
37
verify each signature, s uch verification [must] shall be
38
completed, certified and delivered to the secretary of state
39
by 5:00 p.m. on the last Tuesday in July prior to the
40
election, or in the event of complete verification of
41
signatures after a failed random sample, full verification
42
shall be completed, certified and delivered to the secretary
43
of state by 5:00 p.m. on the last Tuesday in July or by
44
5:00 p.m. on the Frida y of the fifth week after receipt of
45
the signatures by the local election authority, whichever is
46
later.

SB 1721 13
47
3. If the election authority or the secretary of state
48
determi n es that the congressional district number written
49
after the signature of any voter is not the congressional
50
district of which the voter is a resident, the election
51
authority or the secretary of state shall correct the
52
congressional district number on the petition page. Failure
53
of a voter to give the voter's correct congressiona l
54
district number shall not by itself be grounds for not
55
counting the voter's signature.
56
4. The election authority shall return the copies of
57
the pet i tion pages to the secretary of state with
58
annotations regarding any invalid or questionable signatures
59
which the election authority has been asked to check by the
60
secretary of state. The election authority shall verify the
61
number of pages rec e ived for that county, and also certify
62
the total number of valid signatures of voters from each
63
congressional district which the election authority has been
64
asked to check by the secretary of state.
65
5. The secretary of state is authorized to adopt rules
66
to ensu r e uniform, complete, and accurate checking of
67
petition signatures either by actual count or random
68
sampling. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant
69
to this s e ction shall become effective unless it has been
70
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536.
71
6. After a period of three years from the time of
72
submiss i on of the petitions to the secretary of state, the
73
secretary of state, if the secretary determines that
74
retention of such petitions is no longer necessary, may
75
destroy such petitions.
1
[116.190. 1. Any citizen who wishes to
2
challenge the official ballot title or the
3
fiscal note prepared for a proposed

SB 1721 14
4
constitutional amendment submitted by the
5
general assembly, by initiative petition, or by
6
constitutional convention, or for a statutory
7
initiative or referendum measure, may bring an
8
action in the circuit court of Cole County. The
9
action shall be brought within ten days after
10
the official ballot title is certified by the
11
secretary of state in accordance with the
12
provisions of this chapter, in the case of an
13
initiative petition and not later than the
14
twenty-second Tuesday prior to the general
15
election at which the ballot measure will be
16
submitted to the voters, in the case of all
17
other statewide ballot measures.
18
2. The secretary of state shall be named
19
as a party defendant in any action challenging
20
the official ballot title prepared by the
21
secretary of state. When the action challenges
22
the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary
23
prepared by the auditor, the state auditor shall
24
also be named as a party defendant. The
25
president pro tem of the senate, the speaker of
26
the house and the sponsor of the measure and the
27
secretary of state shall be the named party
28
defendants in any action challenging the
29
official summary statement, fiscal note or
30
fiscal note summary prepared pursuant to section
31
116.155.
32
3. The petition shall state the reason or
33
reasons why the summary statement portion of the
34
official ballot title is insufficient or
35
unfair. Alternatively, the petition shall state
36
the reasons why the fiscal note or the fiscal
37
note summary portion of the official ballot
38
title is insufficient or unfair and shall
39
request a different fiscal note or fiscal note
40
summary portion of the official ballot title.
41
4. (1) The action shall be placed at the
42
top of the civil docket.
43
(2) (a) Insofar as the action challenges
44
the summary statement portion of the official
45
ballot title, the court shall consider the
46
petition, hear arguments, and in its decision
47
certify the summary statement portion of the

SB 1721 15
48
official ballot title to the secretary of state
49
as originally written if the court finds the
50
summary statement to be sufficient and fair. If
51
the court finds the summary statement to be
52
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
53
suggested revisions for the summary statement to
54
remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in its
55
decision, order the secretary of state to write
56
a first revised summary statement that is
57
sufficient and fair.
58
(b) The secretary of state shall submit a
59
first revised summary statement to the court
60
within seven days. If, after submission to the
61
court of a first revised summary statement by
62
the secretary of state, the court finds the
63
first revised summary statement to be sufficient
64
and fair, the court shall certify to the
65
secretary of state that statement and order it
66
to appear on the ballot. If the court finds the
67
first revised summary statement to be
68
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
69
suggested revisions for the statement to remedy
70
the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision,
71
order the secretary of state to write a second
72
revised summary statement that is sufficient and
73
fair.
74
(c) The secretary of state shall submit a
75
second revised summary statement to the court
76
within five days. If, after submission to the
77
court of a second revised summary statement by
78
the secretary of state, the court finds the
79
second revised summary statement to be
80
sufficient and fair, the court shall certify to
81
the secretary of state that statement and order
82
it to appear on the ballot. If the court finds
83
the second revised summary statement to be
84
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
85
suggested revisions for the statement to remedy
86
the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision,
87
order the secretary of state to write a third
88
revised summary statement that is sufficient and
89
fair.
90
(d) The secretary of state shall submit a
91
third revised summary statement to the court

SB 1721 16
92
within three days. If, after submission to the
93
court of a third revised summary statement by
94
the secretary of state, the court finds the
95
third revised summary statement to be sufficient
96
and fair, the court shall certify to the
97
secretary of state that statement and order it
98
to appear on the ballot. If the court finds the
99
third revised summary statement to be
100
insufficient or unfair, or if the secretary of
101
state neglects or refuses to submit any of the
102
revised summary statements within the times
103
mandated by this subdivision when so ordered,
104
the court shall revise the summary statement in
105
a manner that is sufficient and fair and order
106
the secretary of state to place that summary
107
statement on the ballot with the measure.
108
(e) During all revisions as provided in
109
this subdivision, the case shall remain open.
110
(f) Any nonprevailing party may make
111
appeals as provided by law only following:
112
a. The finding of the circuit court that a
113
summary statement was sufficient and fair; or
114
b. The circuit court ordering its own
115
summary statement to be placed on the ballot
116
pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision.
117
(g) Any action brought pursuant to this
118
section challenging a statewide ballot measure
119
appearing on the ballot at an election called by
120
the governor pursuant to Article XII, Section
121
2(b), Missouri Constitution, whether at the
122
primary election or at a special election, or at
123
a special election for a referendum petition
124
measure called by the general assembly pursuant
125
to Article III, Section 52(b), Missouri
126
Constitution, shall be expedited by the court to
127
bring a resolution of the matter prior to the
128
printing of ballots. The court may shorten any
129
timeframe under this section to achieve this
130
purpose.
131
(3) Insofar as the action challenges the
132
fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion
133
of the official ballot title, the court shall
134
consider the petition, hear arguments, and in
135
its decision, either certify the fiscal note or

SB 1721 17
136
the fiscal note summary portion of the official
137
ballot title to the secretary of state or remand
138
the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary to
139
the auditor for preparation of a new fiscal note
140
or fiscal note summary pursuant to the
141
procedures set forth in section 116.175. Any
142
party to the suit may appeal to the supreme
143
court within ten days after a circuit court
144
decision pursuant to this subdivision.
145
5. Any action brought under this section
146
that is not fully and finally adjudicated within
147
one hundred eighty days of filing, and more than
148
seventy days prior to election in which the
149
measure is to appear, including all appeals,
150
shall be extinguished, unless a court extends
151
such period upon a finding of good cause for
152
such extension. Such good cause shall consist
153
only of court-related scheduling issues and
154
shall not include requests for continuance by
155
the parties.]
1
116.190. 1. Any [citizen] Missouri registered voter
2
who wishes to cha l lenge the official ballot title or the
3
fiscal note prepared for a proposed constitutional amendment
4
submitted by the general assembly, by initiative petition,
5
or by constitutional convention, or for a statutory
6
initiative or referendum measure, may bring an action in the
7
circuit court of Cole County. The action must be brought
8
within ten days after the off i cial ballot title is certified
9
by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions
10
of this chapter.
11
2. The secretary of state shall be named as a party
12
defenda n t in any action challenging the official ballot
13
title prepared by the secretary of state. When the action
14
challenges the fiscal note or the fiscal n ote summary
15
prepared by the auditor, the state auditor shall also be
16
named as a party defendant. The president pro tem of the
17
senate, the speaker of the h ouse and the sponsor of the

SB 1721 18
18
measure and the secretary of state shall be the named party
19
defendants in any action challenging the official summary
20
statement, fiscal note or fiscal note summary prepared
21
pursuant to section 116.155.
22
3. The petition shall state the reason or reasons why
23
the sum m ary statement portion of the official ballot title
24
is insufficient or unfair and shall request a different
25
summary statement portion of the official ballot title.
26
Alternatively, the petition shall state the reasons why the
27
fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion of the
28
official ballot title is insufficient or unfair and shall
29
request a different fiscal note or fiscal note summary
30
portion of the official ballot title.
31
4. The action shall be placed at the top of the civil
32
docket. Insofar as the action challenges the summary
33
statement portion of the official ballot title, the court
34
shall consider the petition, hear arguments, and in its
35
decision certify the summary statement portion of the
36
official ballot title to the secretary of state. Insofar as
37
the action challenges the fiscal note or the fis c al note
38
summary portion of the official ballot title, the court
39
shall consider the petition, hear arguments, and in its
40
decision, either certify the fiscal note or the fiscal note
41
summary portion of the official ballot title to the
42
secretary of state or remand the fiscal note or the fiscal
43
note summary to the auditor for preparation of a new fiscal
44
note or fiscal note summary pursuant to the procedures set
45
forth in section 116.175. Any party [to the suit] may
46
appeal [to the supreme co u rt] within ten days after [a
47
circuit court decision] the entry of judgment by the circuit
48
court. In making the legal notice to election authorities
49
under s ection 116.240, and for the purposes of section

SB 1721 19
50
116.180, the secretary of state shall certify the language
51
which the court certifies to him.
52
5. Any action brought under this section that is not
53
fully a n d finally adjudicated within one hundred eighty days
54
of filing, and more than fifty-six days prior to the
55
election in which the measure is to appear, including all
56
appeals, shall be extinguished, unless a court, before the
57
expiration of the foregoing periods, extends such period
58
upon [a] an express finding of good cause for such extension
59
but no extension shall cause the final adjudication to occur
60
less than fifty-six days before the date of the election.
61
Such good cause shall consist only of court-related
62
scheduling issues and shall not include requests for
63
continuance by the parties. No court, including any
64
appellate court, shall have the authority to issue any form
65
of relief after the expiration of the foregoing periods.
1
116.200. 1. After the secretary of state certifies a
2
petition as s u ffi c ient or insufficient, any [citizen]
3
Missouri registered voter may apply to the circuit court of
4
Cole County to compel [him] the secretary of state to
5
reverse his or her decision. The action must be brought
6
within ten days after the ce r tification is made. All such
7
suits shall be advanced on the court docket and h eard and
8
decided by the court as quickly as possible.
9
2. If the court decides the petition is sufficient,
10
the sec r etary of state shall certify it as sufficient and
11
attach a copy of the judgment. If the court decides the
12
petition is insufficient, the c ourt shall enjoin the
13
secretary of state from certifying the measure and all other
14
officers from printing the measure on the ballot.

SB 1721 20
15
3. Any party may appeal within ten days after [a
16
decisio n is rendered, any party may appeal it to the supreme
17
court] the entry of the judgment by the circuit court.
1
116.332. 1. Before a constitutional amendment
2
petition, a s t atu t ory initiative petition, or a referendum
3
petition may be circulated for signatures, a sample sheet
4
[must] shall be submitted to the secretary of state in the
5
form in which it will be circulated. Sample sheets may be
6
submitted to the secretary of state a ny time after a general
7
election until six months prior to the next general
8
election. When a person submits a sample sheet of a
9
petition h e or she shall designate to the secretary of state
10
the name and address of the person to whom any notices shall
11
be sent pursuant to sections 116.140 and 116.180 and, if a
12
committee or person, except the individual submitting the
13
sample sheet, is funding any portion of the drafting or
14
submitting of the sample sheet, the person submitting the
15
sample sheet shall submit a copy of the filed statement of
16
committee organization required under subsection 5 of
17
section 130.021 showing the date the statement was filed.
18
The secretary of state shall refer a copy of the petition
19
sheet to the attorney general for his approval and to the
20
state auditor for purposes of preparing a fiscal note and
21
fiscal note summary. The secretary of state and attorney
22
general [must] shall each review the petition for
23
[sufficiency as to form] compliance with section 116.050 and
24
Article III, Sections 28, 49, 50, 51, and 52(a) of the
25
Constitution of Missouri and approve or reject the form of
26
the petition, stating the reasons for rejection, if any.
27
2. Within two business days of receipt of any such
28
sample s heet, the office of the secretary of state shall
29
conspicuously post on its website the text of the proposed

SB 1721 21
30
measure, a disclaimer stating that such text may not
31
constitute the full and correct text as required under
32
section 116.050, and the name of the person or organization
33
submitting the sample sheet. The secretary of state's
34
failure to comply with such p osting shall be considered a
35
violation of chapter 610 and subject to the penalties
36
provided under subsection 3 of section 610.027. The posting
37
shall be removed within three days of either the withdrawal
38
of the petition under section 116.115 or the rejection for
39
any reason of the petition.
40
3. Upon receipt of a petition from the office of the
41
secreta r y of state, the attorney general shall examine the
42
petition [as to form] and determine whether it complies with
43
section 116.050 and Article III, Sections 28, 49, 50, 51,
44
and 52(a) of the Constitution of Missouri. If the petition
45
is rejected [as to form], the attorney gen e ral shall forward
46
his or her comments to the secretary of state within ten
47
days after receipt of the petition by the attorney general.
48
If the petition is approved [as to form], the attorney
49
general shall forward his or her approval [as to form] to
50
the secretary of state within ten days after receipt of the
51
petition by the attorney general.
52
4. The secretary of state shall review the comments
53
and sta t ements of the attorney general [as to form] and make
54
a final decision as to the approval or rejection [of the
55
form] of the petition. The secretary of state shall send
56
written notice to the p erson who submitted the petition
57
sheet of the approval within fifteen days after submission
58
of the petition sheet. The secretary of state shall send
59
written notice if the p etition has been rejected, together
60
with reasons for rejection, within fifteen days after
61
submission of the petition sheet.

SB 1721 22
1
[116.334. 1. If the petition form is
2
approved, the secretary of state shall make a
3
copy of the sample petition available on the
4
secretary of state's website. For a period of
5
fifteen days after the petition is approved as
6
to form, the secretary of state shall accept
7
public comments regarding the proposed measure
8
and provide copies of such comments upon
9
request. Within twenty-three days of receipt of
10
such approval, the secretary of state shall
11
prepare and transmit to the attorney general a
12
summary statement of the measure which shall be
13
a concise statement not exceeding one hundred
14
words. This statement shall be in the form of a
15
question using language neither intentionally
16
argumentative nor likely to create prejudice
17
either for or against the proposed measure. The
18
attorney general shall within ten days approve
19
the legal content and form of the proposed
20
statement.
21
2. Signatures obtained prior to the date
22
the official ballot title is certified by the
23
secretary of state shall not be counted. Once
24
the secretary of state certifies the official
25
ballot title, signatures may be collected, even
26
if the ballot title is subject to an action in
27
court challenging the sufficiency and fairness
28
of the ballot title. If a court orders a change
29
that alters the content of the official ballot
30
title, then all signatures gathered before such
31
change occurred shall not be invalidated based
32
upon the fact that one or more signatures were
33
gathered prior to the alteration of the official
34
ballot title, regardless of whether those
35
signatures were gathered on petition pages that
36
displayed what was previously the official
37
ballot title as certified by the secretary of
38
state. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit
39
the invalidation of a signature for a reason
40
otherwise allowed by this chapter.
41
3. Signatures for statutory initiative
42
petitions shall be filed not later than six
43
months prior to the general election during
44
which the petition's ballot measure is submitted

SB 1721 23
45
for a vote, and shall also be collected not
46
earlier than the day after the day upon which
47
the previous general election was held.]
1
116.334. 1. If the petition [form] is approved under
2
section 116.3 3 2, t he secretary of state shall make a copy of
3
the sample petition available on the secretary of state's
4
website. For a period of fifteen days after the petition is
5
approved [as to form] under section 116.332, the secretary
6
of state shall accept public comments regarding the proposed
7
measure and provide copies of such comments upon request.
8
Within twenty-three days of receipt of such approval, the
9
secretary of state shall prepare and transmit to the
10
attorney general a summary statement of the measure which
11
shall be a concise statement not exceeding one hundred
12
words. This statement shall [be in the form of a question
13
using] use language neither intentionally argumentative nor
14
likely to create prejudice either for or against the
15
proposed measure. The attorney general shall within ten
16
days approve the l egal content and form of the proposed
17
statement.
18
2. Signatures obtained prior to the date the official
19
ballot t itle is certified by the secretary of state shall
20
not be counted.
21
3. Signatures for statutory initiative petitions shall
22
be file d not later than six months prior to the general
23
election during which the petition's ballot measure is
24
submitted for a vote, and shall also be collected not
25
earlier than the day after the day upon which the previous
26
general election was held.
1
[116.153. Within thirty days of issuing
2
certification that the petition contains a
3
sufficient number of valid signatures pursuant
4
to section 116.150, the joint committee on

SB 1721 24
5
legislative research shall hold a public hearing
6
in Jefferson City to take public comments
7
concerning the proposed measure. Such hearing
8
shall be a public meeting under chapter 610.
9
Within five business days after the end of the
10
public hearing, the joint committee on
11
legislative research shall provide a summary of
12
the hearing to the secretary of state or his or
13
her designee and the secretary of state shall
14
post a copy of the summary on the website of the
15
office of the secretary of state.]
